California statutes. Education Code
 required local contribution pursuant to this section and the school district’s associated state contribution required pursuant to this article as follows:

(1) For a school district determined to have a score of more than 10 points pursuant to Section 17070.59, the school district’s required local matching funds pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be 35 percent and the associated state contribution pursuant to this article shall be 65 percent.

(2) For a school district determined to have a score of 9 or 10 points pursuant to Section 17070.59, the school district’s required local matching funds pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be 37 percent and the associated state contribution pursuant to this article shall be 63 percent.

(3) For a school district determined to have a score of eight points pursuant to Section 17070.59, the school district’s required local
 matching funds pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be 38 percent and the associated state contribution pursuant to this article shall be 62 percent.

(4) For a school district determined to have a score of six or seven points pursuant to Section 17070.59, the school district’s required local matching funds pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be 39 percent and the associated state contribution
 pursuant to this article shall be 61 percent.

(5) For a school district determined to have a score of less than six points pursuant to Section 17070.59, the required local matching funds pursuant to subdivision (a)
 shall be 40 percent and the associated state contribution pursuant to this article shall be 60 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 14.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17074.20.

As a condition for the receipt of funds under this article, a school district shall ensure that all buildings modernized comply with Sections 17212, 17212.5, and 17213.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 4.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17074.25.

(a) (1) A modernization apportionment may be used for an improvement to extend the useful life of, or to enhance the physical environment of, the school. The improvement may only include the cost of design, engineering, testing, inspection, plan checking, construction management, demolition, construction, the replacement of portable classrooms, necessary utility costs, utility connection and other fees, the purchase and installation of air-conditioning equipment and insulation materials and related costs, furniture and equipment, including telecommunication equipment to increase school security, fire safety improvements, playground safety improvements, the identification, assessment, or abatement of hazardous asbestos,
 seismic safety improvements, and the upgrading of electrical systems or the wiring or cabling of classrooms in order to accommodate educational technology, including schoolsite-based infrastructure necessary to provide access to broadband internet within the schoolsite. A modernization apportionment may be used for the costs of design, materials, demolition, and construction to advance state energy goals pursuant to state law, support outdoor learning environments, or to directly shade and protect pupils from higher average temperatures, which may include incorporating nature and natural materials. A modernization grant may not be used for costs associated with acquisition and development of real property or for routine maintenance and repair.

(2) A modernization apportionment may
 also be used for any of the following:

(A) The cost of designs and materials that promote the efficient use of energy and water, the maximum use of natural lighting and indoor air quality, the use of recycled materials and materials that emit a minimum of toxic substances, the use of acoustics conducive to teaching and learning, and other characteristics of high-performance schools.

(B) Seismic mitigation purposes and related design, study, and testing costs.

(C) To remediate any water outlet used for drinking or preparing food with lead levels in excess of 15 parts per billion.

(D) The control, management, or abatement of lead.

(b) This section shall not preclude a school district from using a grant for modernization to support the modernization of a school kitchen, a transitional kindergarten classroom, a facility to support a local educational agency-administered preschool program, including, but not limited to, a California state preschool program set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 8207) of Chapter 2 of Part 6, that is operated by a school district and located on a schoolsite operated by the district, or a facility to support school nurses and counselors to increase access to health care and mental
 health services.

(c) (1) A modernization apportionment may be used to limit pupil exposure to harmful air pollutants by updating air filtration systems.

(2) (A) This subdivision is declaratory of existing law.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting Chapter 714 of the Statutes of 2018 (Assembly Bill 2453 of the 2017–18 Regular Session) to encourage school districts to add air filtration systems to applications for modernization apportionments when air pollution occasionally or regularly exceeds levels known to be harmful to public health.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article,
 a school district that is apportioned funds pursuant to Section 17073.16 shall use the supplemental grant for expanding an existing, or constructing a new, gymnasium, multipurpose room, library, or school kitchen.

(e) In developing guidelines and regulations for consideration by the board, the department, in consultation with the State Department of Education, shall provide a school district with maximum flexibility in the design and modernization of school facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 15.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17074.26.

The board shall adopt regulations to adjust the per-pupil amounts set forth in Section 17074.14 for modernization projects for school buildings that are 50 years old or older based upon the higher costs associated with modernizing older buildings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 16.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17074.265.

(a) Notwithstanding Article 6 (commencing with Section 17073.10), a school district shall be eligible to receive a modernization apportionment to demolish and construct a building or buildings on an existing schoolsite if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The building or buildings to be replaced are at least 75 years old.

(2) The school district provides a cost-benefit analysis that indicates the total cost to
 modernize the building or buildings is at least 50 percent of the current replacement cost, as defined by the board, of the building or buildings. The cost-benefit analysis may include applicable site development costs.

(b) A project that meets the requirements of subdivision (a) shall be eligible for a grant equal to the grant provided under Section 17072.10 multiplied by the capacity of the building or buildings calculated pursuant to Section 17071.25.

(c) The board may adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 16.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17074.27.

In addition to the uses specified in Section 17074.25, a modernization apportionment may also be used for the control, management, or abatement of lead.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1075, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17074.30.

Commencing with applications submitted after January 1, 2004, any school district applying for funding pursuant to this article shall certify that it has considered the potential for the presence of lead-containing materials in the modernization projects and will follow all relevant federal, state, and local standards for the management of any identified lead.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1075, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Automatic Fire Detection, Alarm, and Sprinkler Systems [17074.50. - 17074.56.]

17074.50.

(a) On and after July 1, 2002, all new construction projects submitted to the Division of the State Architect pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, hardship applications, that require the approval of the Department of General Services shall include an automatic fire detection, alarm, and sprinkler system as set forth in Section 17074.52 and approved by the State Fire Marshal. These provisions shall entitle the school district to all applicable reductions in code requirements, as provided in the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).

(b) On and after July 1, 2002, all modernization projects that have an estimated total cost in excess of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) submitted to the Division of the State Architect pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, hardship applications, that require the approval of the Department of General Services shall include an automatic fire detection and alarm system as set forth in Section 17074.52 and approved by the State Fire Marshal. For a modernization project that is to be completed in more than one phase, the school district may defer installation of the system until the final phase of the modernization project. Solely for purposes of this section, “modernization” means any modification of a permanent structure or construction of a new building on an existing campus.

(c) The Department of General Services shall administer this section based upon the standards adopted by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 17074.52.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 725, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17074.52.

(a) For modernization projects, the automatic fire detection and alarm system required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17074.50 shall consist of smoke or heat detectors, or a combination thereof, as determined by the State Fire Marshall, installed in the school building. The alarm, upon activation of an initiating device, shall alert all occupants and shall transmit the alarm signal to an approved supervising station.

(b) For new construction projects, the automatic fire detection, alarm, and sprinkler system required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17074.50, shall in addition to compliance with subdivision (a), include an automatic fire sprinkler system installed in the school building including, but not necessarily limited to, attic spaces.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 17074.50 or subdivisions (a) or (b) of this section, for a stand alone portable building, the system required pursuant to this article shall consist of an automatic fire detection and alarm system. For the purposes of this subdivision a “stand alone portable building” means a portable building that is used as a single classroom and that is sited more than 25 feet from any other building, including, but not limited to, any other portable building.

(d) Except as required for automatic fire detectors and waterflow detection devices, manual fire alarm boxes shall not be required throughout the school building.

(e) The entire system shall be installed, tested, and maintained in accordance with the regulations of the State Fire Marshal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 725, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17074.54.

(a) A portable building that is sited with the intent that it be at the site for less than three years and is sited upon a temporary foundation in a manner that is designed to permit easy removal, is exempt from Sections 17074.50 and 17074.52 for a period of three years from the date of siting.

(b) After the three-year exemption set forth in subdivision (a), a school district may request an extension of the exemption for an additional period not to exceed three additional years. The board shall grant the request if the school district presents convincing evidence demonstrating to the satisfaction of the board that the extension is necessary.

(c) For purposes of this section, “ portable building” means a classroom building of modular design and construction that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) It is designed and constructed to be relocatable and transportable over public streets.

(2) It is designed and constructed for relocation without detaching the roof or the floor from the building.

(3) It has a floor area of 2,000 square feet or less when measured at the most exterior walls.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 725, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17074.56.

(a) The State Allocation Board shall adjust the per-pupil grant amount set forth in Section 17072.10 as necessary to accommodate 50 percent of the increased costs due to the automatic fire detection, alarm, and sprinkler system required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17074.50. The board shall adjust the per-pupil grant amount set forth in Section 17074.10 as necessary to accommodate 80 percent of the increased costs due to the automatic fire detection and alarm system required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17074.50. The board shall establish a method to provide up to 100 percent of the increased costs of the automatic fire detection, alarm, and sprinkler, if applicable, systems for school districts which qualify for hardship assistance pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 17075.10.

(b) By July 1, 2003, the board shall review the adequacy of the per-pupil grant adjustments made pursuant to subdivision (a) and shall increase or decrease those adjustments as determined to be necessary.

(c) Any project submitted to the Division of the State Architect on or after September 1, 2001, that includes a qualifying fire detection, alarm, and sprinkler, if applicable, system, and that has not been fully funded prior to July 1, 2002, shall be eligible for grant or eligibility adjustments as set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 725, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Hardship Application [17075.10. - 17075.20.]

17075.10.

(a) (1) For health and safety projects for school facilities that are determined by the department to pose an unacceptable risk of injury to occupants in the event of a seismic event, a school district shall demonstrate both of the following to the satisfaction of the board:

(A) That due to unusual circumstances that are beyond the control of the school district, excessive costs need to be incurred in the construction of school facilities.

(B) That the facilities are needed to ensure the health and safety of pupils if the health and safety of pupils is at risk.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), health and safety projects include projects to replace the most vulnerable school facilities that are identified as a Category 2 building, as defined in the report submitted pursuant to Section 17317.

(b) (1) A school district is eligible for health and safety funding to replace, reconstruct, or construct new classrooms and related facilities if the school district demonstrates there is a threat to the health and safety of pupils. To determine the applicable grant amounts, the district shall prepare and submit to the department a cost-benefit analysis that compares the minimum cost to remain in the classroom or related facility and mitigate the health and safety problem with the current replacement cost.

(2) The project qualifies for modernization funding if the minimum cost is less than 50 percent of the current replacement cost of the classroom or related facility.

(3) The project qualifies for replacement facilities if the cost-benefit analysis prepared pursuant to paragraph (1) demonstrates that the cost to remain in the classroom or related facility and mitigate the problem is at least 50 percent of the replacement value.

(c) The department shall develop regulations to define eligible health and safety projects that meet the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) for purposes of project approval by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 18.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17075.11.

(a) A school district may apply for hardship assistance in cases of extraordinary circumstances.

(b) A school district applying for state funding under this section shall demonstrate that due to unusual circumstances that are beyond the control of the school district, excessive costs need to be incurred in the construction of school facilities.

(c) The board shall review the increased costs that may be uniquely associated with urban construction and shall adjust the per-pupil grant for new construction or modernization hardship applications as necessary to accommodate those costs. The board shall adopt regulations setting forth the standards, methodology, and a schedule of
 allowable adjustments for the urban adjustment factor established pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) This section shall apply to applications submitted on or after October 31, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 13.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17075.15.

(a) From funds available from any bond act for the purpose of funding facilities for school districts with a financial hardship, the board may provide other construction, modernization, or relocation assistance as set forth in this chapter or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 17085) to the extent that severe circumstances may require, and may adjust or defer the local financial participation, as pupil health and safety considerations require to the extent that bond act funds are provided for this purpose.

(b) The board shall adopt regulations for determining the amount of funding that may be provided to a district, and the eligibility and
 prioritization of funding, under this article.

(c) The regulations shall define the amount, and sources, of financing that the school district could reasonably provide for school facilities as follows:

(1) Unencumbered funds available in all facility accounts in the school district, including, but not limited to, fees on development, redevelopment funds, sale proceeds from surplus property, funds generated by certificates of participation for facility purposes, bond funds, federal grants, and other funds available for school facilities, as the board may determine.

(2) The board may exclude from consideration all funds encumbered for a specific capital outlay purpose, a reasonable amount for interim housing, and other funds
 that the board may find are not reasonably available for the project.

(d) The regulations shall also specify a method for determining required levels of local effort to obtain matching funds. The regulations shall include consideration of at least all of the following factors:

(1) Whether the school district has passed a bond measure within the two-year period immediately preceding the application for funding under this article, the proceeds of which are substantially available for use in the project to be funded under this chapter, but remains unable to provide the necessary matching share requirement.

(2) Whether the principal amount of the current outstanding bonded indebtedness issued for the purpose of
 constructing school facilities for the school district and secured by property within the school district or by revenues of, or available to, the school district, which shall include general obligation bonds, Mello-Roos bonds, school facility improvement district bonds, certificates of participation, and other debt instruments issued for the purpose of constructing school facilities for the school district and for which owners of property within the school district or the school district are paying debt service is at least 60 percent of the school district’s total bonding capacity, as determined by the board.

(3) (A) Whether the total bonding capacity, as defined in Section 15102 or 15106, as applicable, is fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) or less, in which case, the school district shall be deemed eligible for
 financial hardship.

(B) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the amount described in subparagraph (A) shall be adjusted each fiscal year by the inflation adjustment computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02.

(4) Whether the application for funding under this article is from a county superintendent of schools.

(5) Whether the school district submits other evidence of substantial local effort acceptable to the board.

(6) The value of any unused local general obligation debt capacity, and developer fees added to the needs analysis to reflect the district’s financial hardship, available for the purposes of school facilities financing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 19.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------

17075.20.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the board may provide assistance under this chapter for purposes of procuring interim housing, including, but not limited to, the leasing or acquisition of portable classrooms and any work associated with placing them on a site, to school districts and county offices of education impacted by a natural disaster for which the Governor has declared a state of emergency. The allocated funds shall supplement funding from insurance or any other local, state, or federal government disaster assistance.

(b) For purposes of this section, and notwithstanding any other section of this chapter, school districts and county offices of education
 determined by the board to be impacted by a natural disaster as described in subdivision (a) are deemed to meet the requirements set forth in Section 17075.10.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a school district or county office of education that receives assistance under this section shall be entitled to retain savings from a project and use those savings for other high-priority capital outlay purposes consistent with the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 17070.63.

(d) (1) A grant provided pursuant to this section shall not affect the applicant’s eligibility for any other program under this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a portable classroom purchased pursuant to subdivision (a)
 shall be included in the determination of eligibility for new construction funding pursuant to Section 17071.75.

(e) The board may provide any other assistance to a school district or county office of education determined by the board to be impacted by a natural disaster as described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 20.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Classroom Security Locks [17075.50. - 17075.50.]

17075.50.

(a) On and after July 1, 2011, all new construction projects submitted to the Division of the State Architect pursuant to this chapter shall include locks that allow doors to classrooms and any room with an occupancy of five or more persons to be locked from the inside.

(b) The locks shall conform to the specifications and requirements set forth in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) Doors that are locked from the outside at
 all times and pupil restrooms are exempt from the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 430, Sec. 2.   (AB 211)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Program Accountability [17076.10. - 17076.12.]

17076.10.

(a) A school district that receives any funds pursuant to this chapter shall submit a summary report of expenditure of state funds and of school district matching funds annually until all state funds and school district matching funds are expended, and shall then submit a final report to the board. The board may require an audit of these reports or other school district records to ensure that all funds received pursuant to this chapter are expended in accordance with program requirements.

(b) If the board finds that a participating school district has not made substantial progress towards increasing its pupil capacity or modernizing its facilities within 18 months of receiving any funding pursuant to this chapter, the board shall rescind the apportionment in an amount equal to the unexpended funds.

(c) (1) If the board, after the review of expenditures or audit has been conducted pursuant to subdivision (a), determines that a school district failed to expend funds in accordance with this chapter, the department shall notify the school district of the amount that must be repaid to the 1998 State School Facilities Fund, the 2002 State School Facilities Fund, the 2004 State School Facilities Fund, the 2006 State School Facilities Fund, or the 2016 State School Facilities Fund, as the case may be, within 60 days. If the school district fails to make the required payment within 60 days, the department shall notify the Controller and the school district in writing, and the Controller shall deduct an amount equal to the amount to be repaid by the school district under this subdivision, from the school district’s next principal apportionment or apportionments of state funds to the school district, other than basic aid apportionments required by Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution. Any amounts obtained by the Controller shall be deposited into the 1998 State School Facilities Fund, the 2002 State School Facilities Fund, the 2004 State School Facilities Fund, the 2006 State School Facilities Fund, or the 2016 State School Facilities Fund, as appropriate.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the board determines that repayment of the full liability within 60 days after the board action would constitute a severe financial hardship, as defined by the board, for the school district, the board shall approve a plan of equal annual payments over a period of up to 20 years. The plan shall include interest on each year’s outstanding balance at the rate earned on the state’s Pooled Money Investment Account during that year. The Controller shall withhold amounts, other than basic aid apportionments required by Section 6 of Article IX of the California Constitution, pursuant to the plan.

(d) If a school district receives an apportionment, but has not met the criteria to have funds released pursuant to Section 17072.32 or 17074.15 within a period established by the board, but not to exceed 18 months, the board shall rescind the apportionment and deny the district’s application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 44, Sec. 13.   (AB 130)   Effective July 9, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

17076.11.

(a) If the board determines that a school district, county office of education, joint powers authority, or charter school is in default, or projected to default, with the requirements of any program administered by the board, the board may withhold any new approvals for that school district, county office of education, joint powers authority, or charter school under this chapter. The board may require sufficient evidence from the applicant that a default or projected default has been addressed before making any new approvals.

(b) The withholding of any new approvals pursuant to this section shall not, in and of itself, make the board liable for any tort, breach of contract, or any other action for damages caused by an applicant arising
 from new construction or modernization by the applicant. These contracts include, but are not limited to, contracts between the applicant and its construction contractors, construction managers, architects, or engineers. The applicant shall be liable for all torts, breaches of contract, or any other actions for damages caused by the applicant.

(c) For purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(1) “Charter school” includes a charter school or entity managing a charter school, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 47604.1.

(2) “New approvals” include, but are not limited to, unfunded approvals, apportionments, fund releases, and closeout audit adjustments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 35.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17076.12.

Any school district using funds allocated pursuant to this chapter for the construction or modernization of a school building shall have a participation goal of at least 3 percent, per year, of the overall dollar amount expended each year by the school district, for disabled veteran business enterprises.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 17076.11 by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 34.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. School Project Safety Components [17077.10. - 17077.10.]

17077.10.

(a) It is a goal of the Legislature to eventually enhance pupil safety by equipping all elementary and secondary school classrooms with a telephone hook connected to a public switched network.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that as of 1999, there are approximately 205,000 classrooms in California’s elementary and secondary schools and only a small, undetermined percentage of these classrooms have telephones. The Legislature finds and declares that in order to protect the safety of pupils, schools should be integrated into local emergency, information, and interagency health and safety, networks with up-to-date telecommunications systems. Connection to these systems would also facilitate community and parent interaction with teachers and schools, and thereby further enhance pupil safety.

(c) “School building” as used in this section means and includes any building used, or designed to be used, for elementary or secondary school purposes and constructed, reconstructed, altered, or added to, by the state or by any city or city and county, or by any political subdivision, or by any school district of any kind within the state, or by any regional occupational center or program, established by or authorized to act by any agreement under joint exercise of power, or by the United States government, or any agency thereof. This definition includes any fabrication, construction, or alteration of a relocatable school building.

(d) Commencing with applications submitted on or after January 1, 2000, any school district applying for funding pursuant to this chapter shall include in its plans and specifications for the construction or fabrication of a new or modernized school building, that includes the construction or fabrication of new or modernized classrooms, a hard-wired connection to a public switched telephone network in each new or modernized classroom. However, a school district may meet this requirement by utilizing wireless technology equal to a hard-wired connection to a public switched telephone network.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 709, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.5. Energy Efficiency  [17077.30. - 17077.35.]

17077.30.

(a) As part of the requirements for submission of an application to the State Allocation Board for funding pursuant to this chapter for any new construction or modernization project, the applicant school district may, at the time of submission of the final drawings to the Division of the State Architect, certify that an energy analysis and report has been prepared that sets forth the utility savings that would be generated if the facilities were designed, constructed, and equipped, with the energy efficiency and renewable technologies that would make the facilities exceed the minimum building energy-efficiency standards mandated for new public buildings pursuant to the latest edition of the California Building Standards Code through the use of energy efficiency and renewable energy technologies.

(b) The energy analysis and report shall include a verifiable life-cycle cost analysis for each proposed energy conservation measure and renewable energy that may include, but need not be limited to, photovoltaic parking lot and security lighting, and solar swimming pool and domestic water heating, showing a return on investment of less than 15 years.

(c) The cost of the energy analyses and reports shall not exceed:

(1) Seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per project for elementary schools.

(2) Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per project for middle schools.

(3) Fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per project for high schools.

(d) An applicant school district may count the following funds or expenditures toward meeting the local matching funds requirement under this chapter:

(1) The amount from any local sources actually expended on the project by the applicant school district for an energy audit.

(2) The amount actually applied to the project from any incentive, grant, or rebate, received by the applicant school district from a program funded pursuant to Section 381 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 17077.10 (as added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 981) by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 21.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17077.35.

(a) An applicant school district may include plan design and other project components that promote school facility energy efficiency approaching the ultimate goal of school facility energy self-sufficiency and pollution reduction, and may seek a grant adjustment for the state’s share of the increased costs associated with those components.

(b) Energy efficiency components that
 enable school facilities to advance state energy goals and adapt to higher average temperatures that pose a threat to the health and safety of pupils and staff are eligible for inclusion into a project pursuant to this
 section, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Electric heating, ventilation, and air conditioning (HVAC), school kitchen equipment, and water heating.

(2) The use of ground source temperatures for heating and cooling.

(3) Energy and water conservation, load reduction, peak-load shifting, and building energy efficiency measures.

(4) Solar water heating technologies.

(5) Onsite renewable energy and storage, such as photovoltaics and battery storage, microgrid controllers, and service panel upgrades.

(6) Shade structures and the conversion of ground and rooftop surfaces to materials with low absorption and reflection of heat, which may include, but are not limited to, natural surfaces.

(c) In order to be eligible for the grant adjustment pursuant to this section, the building proposed for the project, including the energy-efficiency and renewable energy measures used pursuant to this section, shall exceed the nonresidential building energy-efficiency standards specified in Part 6 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 24 of the California Code of
 Regulations. The applicant shall certify that the cost for the project exceeds the amount of funding otherwise available to the applicant under this chapter.

(d) The board shall provide an applicant for a new construction or modernization project with a grant adjustment to provide an increase not to exceed 5 percent of its state grants authorized by Sections 17072.10 and 17074.10 for the state’s share of costs associated with design, purchase, and installation related to school facility energy efficiency as set forth in this article.

(e) The board may adopt regulations for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 81, Sec. 21.   (AB 247)   Effective July 3, 2024.   Operative November 6, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 30 of Ch. 81.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10.6. Joint-Use Facilities [17077.40. - 17077.45.]

17077.40.

(a) With funds made available for the purposes of this article, the board may provide a grant to fund joint-use projects to construct facilities on kindergarten to grade 12, inclusive, schoolsites.

(b) A school district may apply to the board for funding under this article for a project that meets any of the following criteria:

(1) The joint-use project is part of an application for new construction funding under this chapter, and will increase the size or extra cost associated with the joint use of the proposed multipurpose room, gymnasium, child care facility, library, or teacher education facility beyond that necessary for school use.

(2) The joint-use project proposes to either reconfigure existing school buildings or construct new school buildings, or both, to provide for a multipurpose room, a gymnasium, a library, a child care facility, or a teacher education facility and the project will be located at a school that does not have the type of facility for which funds are requested or the existing facility is inadequate.

(3) The joint-use project proposes to either reconfigure existing school buildings or construct new school buildings, or both, to provide for facilities to improve pupil academic achievement, and the plans for the facility were accepted for review and approval by the department prior to January 1, 2004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 587, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17077.42.

In order to be approved for a grant under this article, the applicant district shall demonstrate that it has complied with all of the following:

(a) The school district has entered into a joint-use agreement with a governmental agency, public community college, public college or public university, or a nonprofit organization approved by the board.

(b) The joint-use agreement specifies the method of sharing capital and operating costs, specifies relative responsibilities for the operation and staffing of the facility, and specifies the manner in which the safety of the pupils will be ensured.

(c) The joint-use agreement specifies the amount of the contribution to be made by the school district and the joint-use partner toward the 50-percent local share of eligible project costs. The contribution made by a joint-use partner shall be no less than 25 percent of eligible project costs, unless the school district has passed a local bond which specifies that proceeds of sale of the bonds are to be used for the joint-use project, in which case the school district may opt to provide up to the full 50-percent local share of eligible costs.

(d) The school district demonstrates that the facility will be used to the maximum extent possible for both school and community purposes, or both school and higher education purposes, as applicable.

(e) (1) The project application qualifies for funding under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 17077.40 and the school district has received all approvals necessary for apportionment under this chapter.
